Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.560

Remedies additional.

The remedies provided for in this chapter shall be in addition to, and not exclusive of, any other remedies or penalties provided for in this chapter or now or hereafter existing at law or in equity, and such remedies shall be concurrent and alternative and neither singly nor combined shall the same be exclusive.

[ 1961 c 256 s 56.]